Utah statutes.
9-8-503.   Preservation easement.

Any owner of a fee simple interest in real property may convey, and any other party entitled to own real property interests may accept, a preservation easement pertaining to the real property if the real property possesses historical value that will be enhanced or preserved by the terms of the easement regarding restoration or preservation of the real property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

